Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 33
REENTRY PROGRAM

Section

17-33-101. Reentry planning and programs for adult parole - grant program - rules - reports - repeal.

The department shall administer appropriate programs for offenders prior to and after release to assist offenders with reentry into society based upon the assessed need as determined by the executive director and suitability of individual offenders for such services. The department shall administer the reentry programs in collaboration with the division of adult parole in the department and the youthful offender system in the department.

The department shall design the reentry program to reduce the possibility of each offender returning to prison, to assist each offender in rehabilitation, and to provide each offender with life management skills that allow him or her to function successfully in society.

On and after July 1, 2014, the department shall develop and implement initiatives within the department specifically designed to decrease recidivism, enhance public safety, and increase each offender's chances of achieving success upon his or her release to the community.

Subject to appropriations, on and after July 1, 2014, the department shall develop and implement initiatives specifically designed to assist offenders in a correctional facility to prepare for release to the community. An initiative developed and implemented pursuant to this subsection (4) may include, but need not be limited to, the following components:

Enhanced case management capabilities to allow case managers the ability to create individualized institutional case plans that help address the offender's assessed risks and needs;

Pre-release specialists to develop pre-release plans and programs for offenders;

The assignment of community parole officers to facilities so that each offender has an understanding of the expectations of community supervision, available services, and parole; and

Transportation for high-risk and high-needs offenders, as defined by the department, who are being released from a correctional facility to a community parole office, to help provide effective supervision, enhance public safety, and expedite critical services.

Subject to appropriations, on and after July 1, 2014, the department shall develop and implement initiatives specifically designed to assist each offender's transition from a correctional facility into the community. An initiative developed and implemented pursuant to this subsection (5) may include, but need not be limited to, the following components:

An evidence-based cognitive behavioral program for offenders;

Community-based mental health consultants to provide assistance with case planning and to consult with and train community parole officers concerning how to secure appropriate and available mental health services for parolees in the community;

In collaboration with the state department of labor and employment created in section 24-1-121, C.R.S., or any other employment or job training program within the community, initiatives to help offenders in the community obtain employment, job placement, or training;

Reentry specialists to help offenders successfully reenter the community;

Consolidation and expansion of emergency assistance contract funding to effectively provide assistance to parolees in the community; and

A program to provide medication-assisted therapies to eligible offenders.

Subject to appropriations, on and after July 1, 2014, the department shall make necessary operational enhancements and develop and implement initiatives specifically designed to ensure that the department has the proper equipment, training, and programs to properly supervise offenders in the community to enhance public safety. An initiative developed and implemented pursuant to this subsection (6) may include, but need not be limited to, the following components:

A comprehensive staff training program that:

Is consistent with research and evidence-based practices;

Enhances basic training and provides annual in-service training for community parole officers and staff; and

Creates staff development within the division of adult parole so that the division will effectively supervise offenders through successful reintegration;

Acquisition of equipment and resources that will effectively monitor and respond to tampering and other alerts released by electronic monitoring units;

Establishment of an equipment replacement plan for enhanced community parole officer safety; and

Enhancements to parole information technology and parolee tracking systems.

Subject to appropriations, on and after January 1, 2015, the department shall develop and implement a grant program to provide funding to eligible community-based organizations that provide prerelease and parole planning services to people in prison and reentry services to people on parole or inmates transitioning through community corrections. The department shall administer the grant program in accordance with policies developed by the executive director pursuant to subsection (7)(b) of this section.

On or before January 1, 2015, the executive director shall develop policies for the administration of the grant program, including but not limited to the following:

A process for determining eligibility criteria for a community-based organization, including but not limited to a community-based organization that serves as an intermediary on behalf of a collaboration of eligible community-based organizations, to receive a grant from the grant program;

A process and timeline whereby a community-based organization may apply for a grant from the grant program;

A process for determining the amount of each grant that is awarded to an eligible community-based organization;

A process for establishing data-reporting requirements for each eligible community-based organization that receives a grant from the grant program; and

A process for determining the maximum amount of moneys that an eligible community-based organization may receive from the grant program in a single fiscal year.

In developing policies for the administration of the grant program pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (7), the executive director may require that staff members of an eligible community-based organization seeking funding from the grant program must submit to a criminal background check before an award decision is made. However, the executive director may not exclude a community-based organization from receiving grant moneys solely because one or more staff members of the community-based organization has a criminal record. If the executive director determines that one or more staff members of an applicant eligible community-based organization has a criminal record, he or she shall consider the factors described in section 24-5-101 (4), C.R.S., before deciding whether to award grant moneys to the community-based organization.

The executive director, or his or her designee, shall make the final decision whether to award or deny a grant from the grant program.

In awarding grants from the grant program each fiscal year, the department:

Shall release as much as one quarter of the amount annually appropriated to the grant program to the intermediary described in subsection (7)(b)(I) of this section at the beginning of each fiscal year. The intermediary shall determine how much of this amount is awarded to each community partner as an advance portion of grant money to be awarded to the community partner.

Shall not award any grant money in excess of the amount in the fund.

The department shall expand the grant program in the 2018-19 fiscal year to maximize the total number of grantees; add grantees in underserved communities, especially in rural areas; and add one or more grantees that specialize in serving the reentry needs of women offenders.

The community-based reentry services cash fund, referred to in this subsection (7) as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department for the grant program developed pursuant to this subsection (7).

Repealed.

(IV.5) (A) The general assembly shall appropriate $1,167,297 to the fund for fiscal year 2021-2022 from the savings from enactment of Senate Bill 21-146. Any money remaining in the fund after July 1, 2022, remains in the fund and may be spent by the department in fiscal year 2022-2023.

(B) The general assembly shall appropriate $1,481,662 to the fund for fiscal year 2022-2023 from the savings from enactment of Senate Bill 21-146.

The state treasurer shall transfer all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund on September 1, 2023, to the general fund.

This subsection (7) is repealed, effective September 1, 2023. Before its repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the grant program in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire article added, p. 448, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1355), ch. 350, p. 1570, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2016:

(7)(f) amended, (HB 16-1192), ch. 83, p. 234, § 15, effective April 14.

L. 2017:

(8) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 282, § 8, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(7)(a), (7)(e), and (7)(f) amended and (7)(g) added, (HB 18-1176), ch. 321, p. 1926, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2019:

(7)(e)(II) amended and (7)(f.5) added, (SB 19-064), ch. 179, p. 2036, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

(7)(a) amended and (7)(f.5)(IV.5) added, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, pp. 3083, 3089, §§ 5, 14, effective July 6.

17-33-102. Colorado offender identification program - rules - report - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Offender ID bank" means the facility in the department where the department securely stores offender identification documents it has acquired.

"Program" means the program established in this section to procure state-issued identification cards for offenders.

"State-issued identification card" means a driver's license or other identification card issued by the department of revenue pursuant to article 2 of title 42 that complies with the federal "Real ID Act of 2005", 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note.

The department shall establish and operate a program to procure state-issued identification cards for offenders.

An offender may participate in the program if the offender is eligible for, but does not have, a valid state-issued identification card. An offender may elect not to participate in the program, but the department shall not deny an eligible offender the opportunity to participate in the program.

The department shall ensure that each offender released from a correctional facility on and after January 1, 2022, who is eligible for a state-issued identification card and who participates in the program, has a state-issued identification card upon release.

The department shall collaborate with the department of revenue to operate the program.

The executive director shall enter into agreements with the department of revenue or the federal social security administration as necessary for the administration of this section.

The program must:

Review each offender upon intake at the Denver reception and diagnostic center to determine each offender's eligibility for a state-issued identification card and the identification options available to the offender;

At least once each year, review department records to determine whether each offender scheduled for release within the next five years has a valid, unexpired state-issued identification card, including at the offender ID bank; and

Assist an offender who elects to participate in the program with obtaining a state-issued identification card. The assistance may include, but is not limited to:

Providing transportation to an office that issues identification cards, its location selected by the department;

Requesting necessary identification documents on the offender's behalf from the offender ID bank;

If the offender is eligible, assisting the offender with ordering a state-issued identification card online; and

Assisting an offender with obtaining any identification documents necessary to obtain a state-issued identification card, including a replacement social security card or birth certificate.

The department shall deliver to each offender, upon release from a correctional facility, the offender's identification documents, including a state-issued identification card, obtained by the department pursuant to this section.

The department shall promulgate rules or policies necessary for the administration of the program.

On or before July 31, 2022, and on or before July 31 of each year thereafter, the department shall post on a publicly available page of its website the following information about the program:

The number of offenders released from a correctional facility in the preceding calendar year who were identified by the program as not having a state-issued identification card and were eligible to participate in the program; and

The number of offenders who elected to participate in the program and were released with state-issued identification cards obtained with the assistance of the program.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-153), ch. 101, p. 404, § 1, effective September 7.